Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. Of the funds appropriated in Section 8 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be expended
for the purpose of the Teach for America program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



ENGR. S. B. NO. 1128 Page 1

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 1128 Page 2